Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.312

Post-audits of state agencies under RCW 43.09.310—Noncompliance—Remediation—Referral to attorney general.

(1) Within thirty days of receipt of an audit under RCW 43.09.310 containing findings of noncompliance with state law, the subject state agency shall submit a response and a plan for remediation to the office of financial management. Within sixty days of receipt of an audit under RCW 43.09.310 containing findings of noncompliance with state law, the office of financial management shall submit the subject state agency's response and a plan for remediation to the governor, the state auditor, the joint legislative audit and review committee, and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house of representatives.

(2) If, at the next succeeding audit of the subject state agency, the state auditor determines that the subject state agency has failed to make substantial progress in remediating the noncompliance with state law, the state auditor shall notify the entities specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Upon receipt of a notification under subsection (2) of this section, a fiscal or policy committee of the senate or house of representatives may refer the matter to the senate committee on facilities and operations or the executive rules committee of the house of representatives, which committee may refer the matter to the attorney general for appropriate legal action under RCW 43.09.330.

[ 2017 c 66 s 2.]